Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 12 Age of Majority

15-12-1.
Persons of full age.

Notwithstanding any general or public law or provision of the common law to the contrary, all persons who have attained the age of eighteen (18) years shall be deemed to be persons of full legal age.

These persons shall have all the duties and obligations, rights, and privileges imposed or granted by law upon those persons who have previously attained the age of twenty-one (21) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 20, § 1.

15-12-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 20, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 68, effective May 27, 1988.